Georgia statutes. TITLE 3 Alcoholic Beverages
Article 1 Public Carriers; Nonprofit Organizations

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1986, p. 778, § 1, designated the existing Code sections in this chapter (§§

3-9-1

through

3-9-3

) as Article 1 of this chapter.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Trade practices — Point-of-sale advertising, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Rules of Department of Revenue, Alcohol and Tobacco Tax Unit, General Provisions, § 560-2-2.18.

3-9-1.
Authorization of distribution or sale of distilled spirits by airlines, railway passenger carriers, and cruise ships; annual authorization fee; payment of taxes on containers; reports.

Notwithstanding anything contained in this title or any other law, the commissioner may authorize the distribution or sale of containers of distilled spirits, containing not more than 50 milliliters per container, by licensed airlines, railway passenger carriers, and cruise ships.

These passenger carriers and cruise ships shall annually obtain, for a fee of $100.00, an authorization from the commissioner for the distribution or sale of such containers.

The carriers and cruise ships shall pay taxes in the proper amounts on the containers distributed or sold in or over the state.

The carriers and cruise ships shall file reports of all distributions or sales of the containers with the commissioner on or before the fifteenth day of the month following the month of distribution or sale and shall remit the proper tax for the distributions or sales at that time. The carriers and cruise ships shall further report to the commissioner any other information the commissioner may deem necessary for the purposes of this title.

History.

Code 1933, § 5A-6301, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1269, § 58; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1416, § 1.

Cross references.

Airline carriers of passengers, T. 6, C. 2 and T. 6, C. 3.

Carriers of passengers generally, §

46-9-130

et seq.

3-9-2.
Authorization of distribution or sale of wine and malt beverages by airlines, railway passenger carriers, and cruise ships; annual authorization fee; payment of taxes on containers; reports.

Notwithstanding anything contained in this title or any other law, the commissioner may authorize the distribution or sale of wine and malt beverages in variously sized containers by licensed airlines, railway passenger carriers, and cruise ships.

The carriers and cruise ships shall annually obtain, for a fee of $50.00 for a wine license and $50.00 for a malt beverage license, an authorization from the commissioner for the distribution or sale of wine and malt beverages in variously sized containers.

The carriers and cruise ships shall pay taxes in the proper amounts on the containers distributed or sold in or over the state.

The carriers and cruise ships shall file reports of all distributions or sales of the containers with the commissioner on or before the fifteenth day of the month following the month of distribution or sale and shall remit the proper tax for the distributions or sales at that time. The carriers and cruise ships shall further report to the commissioner any other information the commissioner may deem necessary for the purposes of this title.

History.

Ga. L. 1976, p. 508, § 1; Code 1933, § 5A-6302, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1269, § 59; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1416, § 2.

Cross references.

Airline carriers of passengers, T. 6, C. 2 and T. 6, C. 3.

Carriers of passengers generally, §

46-9-130

et seq.

3-9-3.
Issuance of permits for sale by nonprofit civic organizations of alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises or wine at retail for off-premises consumption.

Upon the filing of an application and payment of a fee of $25.00 by a bona fide nonprofit civic organization, the commissioner may issue a permit authorizing the organization to sell alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises or to sell wine at retail for off-premises consumption, or both, for a period not to exceed three days, subject to any law regulating the time for selling such beverages.

No more than six permits may be issued to an organization in any one calendar year pursuant to this Code section.

Permits issued pursuant to this Code section shall be valid only for the place specified in the permit. No permit may be issued unless the sale of distilled spirits, wine, or malt beverages is lawful in the place for which the permit is issued.

History.

Code 1933, § 5A-6303, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1; Ga. L. 2008, p. 4, § 1/HB 1243.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Alcoholic beverage license hearings, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Rules of Department of Revenue, Alcohol and Tobacco Tax Unit, Subject 560-2-9.

3-9-4.
Issuance of special use temporary permits for wine auctions by nonprofit civic organizations.

Upon the filing of an application and payment of a fee of $25.00 by a bona fide nonprofit civic organization, the commissioner may issue a special use temporary permit authorizing a bona fide nonprofit civic organization to auction wine in sealed containers only for a period not to exceed three days, subject to any law regulating the time for selling wine.

No more than six special use temporary permits may be issued to a bona fide nonprofit civic organization in any calendar year.

Special use temporary permits issued pursuant to this Code section shall be valid only for the location specified in the permit. No special use temporary permit may be issued unless local licensing authorities have issued to the bona fide nonprofit civic organization a permit or approval for the sale of wine at the location specified in the special use temporary permit. Prior to the commencement of the event described in the special use temporary permit, the bona fide nonprofit civic organization shall furnish to the commissioner a detailed inventory list of the wine to be auctioned including:

The name, address, telephone number, and taxpayer identification number of the person who furnishes the wine for the event; and

The type, brand, label, and quantity of each wine to be sold at auction.

Bona fide nonprofit civic organizations which hold a special use temporary permit issued pursuant to this Code section may auction for off-premises consumption wine in sealed containers, which has been donated to the bona fide nonprofit civic organization by a person who does not currently hold a license that has been issued by the department pursuant to this title, wine which has been donated by a Georgia licensed retailer, or wine which has been donated or purchased from a Georgia licensed wine wholesaler. The bona fide nonprofit civic organization may ship or otherwise transport to the location specified in the special use temporary permit wine donated by a person who does not currently hold a license that has been issued by the department pursuant to this title or wine donated by a Georgia licensed retailer. Georgia excise tax shall be paid to the department on any donated wine. If the bona fide nonprofit civic organization cannot verify, within ten days of the conclusion of the permitted event, that Georgia excise tax for the wine was previously paid to the department, the bona fide nonprofit civic organization shall pay to the department the appropriate excise tax as required by law.

History.

Code 1981, §

3-9-4

, enacted by Ga. L. 2008, p. 4, § 2/HB 1243.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2008, Code Section 3-9-4, as enacted by Ga. L. 2008, p. 536, § 1, was redesignated as Code Section 3-9-6.

3-9-5.
Meaning of the term “bona fide nonprofit civic organization”.

As used in this article, the term “bona fide nonprofit civic organization” means an entity which is exempt from federal income tax pursuant to the provisions of subsection (c), (d), or (e) of 26 U.S.C. Section 501.

History.

Code 1981, §

3-9-5

, enacted by Ga. L. 2008, p. 4, § 2/HB 1243; Ga. L. 2009, p. 8, § 3/SB 46.

3-9-6.
Limousine carrier furnishing alcoholic beverages.

Notwithstanding any provision contained in this title or any other law, the commissioner may issue an annual permit authorizing a limousine carrier to sell alcoholic beverages for consumption only in the vehicle supplied by the limousine carrier upon the filing of an application and payment of a fee of $50.00 by such limousine carrier that holds a certificate issued in accordance with Article 3 of Chapter 7 of Title 46. In addition to the permit fee, the limousine carrier shall pay an annual fee of $15.00 for each vehicle to be authorized for the sale of alcoholic beverages. The commissioner shall issue a sticker for each vehicle so authorized.

A permit issued in accordance with this Code section shall not authorize the wholesale purchase of alcoholic beverages by a limousine carrier and only authorizes purchase from a retail dealer. A permit issued in accordance with this Code section shall be subject to any law regulating the time for selling such beverages.

A permit issued in accordance with this Code section shall not authorize a limousine carrier to purchase or sell an alcoholic beverage in a location where the sale of such alcoholic beverage is unlawful.

Limousine carriers holding permits issued in accordance with this Code section shall comply with the provisions of paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of Code Section 3-3-23.

History.

Code 1981, §

3-9-6

, enacted by Ga. L. 2008, p. 536, § 1/SB 385.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Limousine, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Rules of Department of Revenue, Alcohol and Tobacco Tax Unit, Subject 560-2-12.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2008, Code Section 3-9-4, as enacted by Ga. L. 2008, p. 536, § 1, was redesignated as Code Section 3-9-6.

3-9-7.
Nonprofit distiller license to nonprofit museum; requirements.

As used in this Code section, the term “nonprofit museum” means a museum whose mission includes educating the public about the local, state, and national history of the United States and that is owned and operated by a bona fide nonprofit civic organization which holds title to improved real property with a structure listed on the National Register of Historic Places.

Notwithstanding any other provision contained in this title or any other law, the commissioner may issue a nonprofit distiller license to a nonprofit museum, regardless of whether or not such nonprofit museum holds an annual license to sell malt beverages, wine, or distilled spirits for consumption on the premises, upon the filing of an application and payment of an annual occupational license tax of $100.00. Such nonprofit distiller license shall entitle the nonprofit museum to produce distilled spirits, provided that:

The nonprofit museum shall not produce more than 800 liters of distilled spirits each calendar year;

The nonprofit museum is located in a county or municipality where the production of distilled spirits is authorized, and the local governing authority of such county or municipality has issued a license to the nonprofit museum pursuant to Code Section 3-3-2 for the production of distilled spirits;

The production of distilled spirits, except as otherwise provided in this Code section, shall be used for educational purposes only;

The distilled spirits produced by the nonprofit museum shall be stored and aged only on the premises of the nonprofit museum for which the nonprofit distiller license has been issued and shall not be removed from such premises except through disposal methods consistent with federal and state law and any applicable rules or regulations promulgated thereunder; and

The distilled spirits produced by the nonprofit museum shall only be used on the premises of the nonprofit museum for which the nonprofit distiller license has been issued and only to provide samples pursuant to subsection (c) of this Code section. Such distilled spirits shall not be sold or offered for sale by the nonprofit museum to any person or entity.

The nonprofit distiller license shall authorize the nonprofit museum to provide not more than one-half of one ounce as a complimentary sample of the distilled spirits produced at the nonprofit museum to a guest who has completed an educational tour of the distillery at the nonprofit museum and is of legal drinking age; provided, however, that the nonprofit museum shall not impose a separate charge for the sample and shall not provide, directly or indirectly, more than one sample to a guest in a calendar day. Such sample shall be provided in a designated tasting area on the premises of the nonprofit museum for which the nonprofit distiller license has been issued, and all open bottles shall be visible at all times.

No bond shall be required to be filed with the commissioner for the initial application or the annual renewal application of a nonprofit distiller license.

The annual license fee to be charged by a county or municipality for a nonprofit distiller license shall not be more than $100.00 for each license.

History.

Code 1981, §

3-9-7

, enacted by Ga. L. 2014, p. 759, § 2/SB 240.